Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-6607
Civil penalty; costs; section, how construed.

(1) A person or entity who is found by a court of competent jurisdiction, pursuant to an action initiated by the Director of Insurance, to have committed a fraudulent insurance act set forth in section 44-6604 is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars for the first violation, ten thousand dollars for the second violation, and fifteen thousand dollars for each subsequent violation. An action under this section shall be in lieu of a prosecution under section 28-631.

(2) Costs and expenses incurred in any investigation or other action arising out of a violation under the Insurance Fraud Act may be sought in any judgment, court decree, or other final result. Any recovered costs, except civil or criminal penalties, shall be deposited by the director in the fund from which the costs were expended. The court may make such additional orders or judgments as may be necessary to restore to any person in interest any compensation which may have been acquired by means of any act prohibited in section 44-6604.

(3) This section shall not be construed to prohibit the director and the alleged violator from entering into a written agreement upon commencement of a civil action in which the alleged violator does not admit or deny the charges but consents to payment of the civil penalty. A consent agreement may not be used in a subsequent civil or criminal proceeding relating to any violation of the act.

Laws 1995, LB 385, § 7.